Ohio, session 136, HB688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4113.87 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4113.87. (A) As used in this section, "employer" means every person who employs one or more individuals in this state but does not include a "public employer" as that term is defined in section 9.73 of the Revised Code. (B) No employer shall include on any form for application for employment with the employer any question concerning the criminal background of the applicant. (C) Nothing in this section prohibits an employer from including on any form for application for employment with the employer a statement notifying an applicant of any provision of the Revised Code or federal law that disqualifies an individual with a particular criminal history from employment in a particular position. (D) A person may report an alleged violation of this section to the director of commerce. If, on receipt of such a report, the director determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that a violation exists, the director shall investigate the alleged violation within a reasonable amount of time. If, after an investigation and a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director finds that a violation of this section has occurred, the director may assess a fine against the employer in a reasonable amount, as determined by the director. (E) All money collected under this section shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the industrial compliance operating fund created under section 121.084 of the Revised Code.